New Mexico, session 2026, SB274.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. APPROPRIATIONS.-- A. The following appropriations are made from the general fund for expenditure in fiscal year 2026. Any unexpended balance remaining at the end of fiscal year 2026 shall revert to the general fund: (1) two million seven hundred thousand dollars ($2,700,000) to the juvenile justice division of the children, youth and families department to carry out the duties of that division; and (2) seven million dollars ($7,000,000) to the protective services division of the children, youth and families department to carry out the duties of that department. B. The following appropriations are made from the general fund for expenditure in fiscal year 2027. Any unexpended balance remaining at the end of fiscal year 2027 shall revert to the general fund: (1) eight million dollars ($8,000,000) to the children, youth and families department to finalize and implement the department's child welfare information system; (2) four million dollars ($4,000,000) to the public education department for school improvement activities; (3) two million dollars ($2,000,000) to the department of finance and administration for payment to the Pueblo of Zia for past, present and future use by the state of the Zia symbol; (4) four million dollars ($4,000,000) to the aging and long-term services department for the department's New MexiCare program; and (5) six million dollars ($6,000,000) to the department of transportation for the rural air service enhancement grant program. - 2 -